xapian-core/languages/esperanto.sbl
// Alias: eo

booleans ( foreign )

routines (
    canonical_form
    correlative
    final_apostrophe
    initial_apostrophe
    long_word
    merged_numeral
    pronoun
    standard_suffix
    ujn_suffix
    uninflected
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( vowel aou digit )

define vowel 'aeiou'
define aou 'aou'
define digit '0123456789'

stringescapes {}

stringdef c^ '{U+0109}'
stringdef g^ '{U+011D}'
stringdef h^ '{U+0125}'
stringdef j^ '{U+0135}'
stringdef s^ '{U+015D}'
stringdef u+ '{U+016D}'

stringdef a' '{U+00E1}'
stringdef e' '{U+00E9}'
stringdef i' '{U+00ED}'
stringdef o' '{U+00F3}'
stringdef u' '{U+00FA}'

define canonical_form as (
    unset foreign
    repeat (
        [substring]
        among(
            'cx' (<- '{c^}')
            'gx' (<- '{g^}')
            'hx' (<- '{h^}')
            'jx' (<- '{j^}')
            'sx' (<- '{s^}')
            'ux' (<- '{u+}')
            '{a'}' (<- 'a' set foreign)
            '{e'}' (<- 'e' set foreign)
            '{i'}' (<- 'i' set foreign)
            '{o'}' (<- 'o' set foreign)
            '{u'}' (<- 'u' set foreign)
            'q' 'w' 'x' 'y' (set foreign)
            '-' (unset foreign)
            '' (next)
        )
    )
    not foreign
)

define initial_apostrophe as (
    ['{'}'] 'st' among('as' 'i' 'is' 'os' 'u' 'us') atlimit <- 'e'
)

backwardmode (
    define pronoun as (
        [try 'n']
        among(
            'ci' 'gi' '{g^}i' 'hi' 'ili' 'i{s^}i' 'ivi' 'li' 'mal{s^}i' 'mi' 'ni'
            'oni' 'ri' 'si' '{s^}i' '{s^}li' 'vi'
        )
        (atlimit or '-') delete
    )

    define final_apostrophe as (
        ['{'}']
        ('l' atlimit <- 'a') or
        ('un' atlimit <- 'u') or
        (
            among(
                'adi' 'almen' 'amb' 'ank' 'ankor' 'anstat' 'anta{u+}hier' 'apen'
                'bald' '{c^}irk' 'hier' 'hodi' 'kontr' 'kvaz' 'malbald' 'malgr'
                'morg' 'postmorg' 'presk' 'tut{c^}irk'
            ) (atlimit or '-') <- 'a{u+}'
        ) or
        (<- 'o')
    )

    define ujn_suffix as (
        [try 'n' try 'j'] among('aliu' 'unu') (atlimit or '-') delete
    )

    define uninflected as (
        among(
            'aha' 'amen' 'dirlididi' 'disde' 'ehe' 'ekde' 'elde' 'haha'
            'haleluja' 'hola' 'hosana' 'hura' '{h^}a{h^}a' 'mal{c^}i' 'malkaj'
            'malpli' 'maltra' 'maltre' 'maltro' 'minus' 'muu' 'oho' 'tamen'
            'uhu'
        )
        (atlimit or '-')
    )

    define merged_numeral as (
        among('du' 'tri' 'unu')
        among('cent' 'dek')
    )

    define correlative as (
        []
        // Ignore -al, -am, etc. since they can't be confused with suffixes.
        test (
            ((try 'n'] 'e') or (try 'n' try 'j'] aou))
            'i'
            try among('{c^}' 'k' 'kelk' 'mult' 'nen' 'samt' 't')
            (atlimit or '-')
        )
        delete
    )

    define long_word as (
        loop 2 gopast vowel or (gopast '-' next) or gopast digit
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        [
        among(
            'a' 'aj' 'ajn' 'an'
            'e' 'en'
            'i' 'as' 'is' 'os' 'u' 'us'
            'o' 'oj' 'ojn' 'on'
                ()
            'j' 'jn' 'n'
                (test ('-' or digit))
        )
        try '-'
        ]
        delete
    )
)

define stem as (
    test canonical_form
    do initial_apostrophe
    backwards (
        not pronoun
        do final_apostrophe
        not correlative
        not uninflected
        not merged_numeral
        not ujn_suffix
        test long_word
        standard_suffix
    )
)
